South Dakota, session 2026, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 21-10:
Terms used in sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this Act mean:
(1) "Data center," a centralized repository for the dissemination, management,
processing, and storage of electronic data and information, including:
(a) Application, cloud, or web hosting;
(b) Cloud computing;
(c) Colocation services;
(d) Cryptocurrency mining;
(e) Media streaming support;
(f) Platform as a service;
(g) Software as a service; and
(h) Any other comparable digital service. which has an anticipated peak electrical
demand of ten megawatts or greater; and
(2) "Residential area," any area designated or zoned for residential use pursuant to
local law or zoning ordinance.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 21-10:
Effective July 1, 2026, a facility housing a data center may not be established within
one mile of any residence or residential area, but a county, municipality, or township may
adopt more restrictive data center siting requirements.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 21-10:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

127A 2 127
A data center may not exceed a continuous noise level of forty-five decibels,
measured according to federal or local environmental standards, at the nearest property
line of a residential area.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 21-10:
A data center in violation of section 2 or 3 of this Act is declared a nuisance. The
state's attorney or any affected citizen may maintain an action against the operator of the
data center, and against the owner of the building in which or ground upon which the
nuisance exists, to enjoin the nuisance.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.